Missouri, session 2026, HB1962.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 195.417 and 579.060, RSMo, are repealed and two new sections
enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 195.417 and 579.060, to read as follows:
195.417. 1. The limits specified in this section shall not apply to any quantity of such
product, mixture, or preparation which must be dispensed, sold, or distributed in a pharmacy
pursuant to a valid prescription.
2. Within any thirty-day period, no person shall sell, dispense, or otherwise provide to
the same individual, and no person shall purchase, receive, or otherwise acquire more than the
following amount: any number of packages of any drug product containing any detectable
amount of ephedrine, phenylpropanolamine, or pseudoephedrine, or any of their salts or
optical isomers, or salts of optical isomers, either as:
(1) The sole active ingredient; or
(2) One of the active ingredients of a combination drug; or
(3) A combination of any of the products specified in subdivisions (1) and (2) of this
subsection;

in any total amount greater than seven and two-tenths grams, without regard to the number of
transactions.
3. Within any twenty-four-hour period, no pharmacist, intern pharmacist, or
registered pharmacy technician shall sell, dispense, or otherwise provide to the same
individual, and no person shall purchase, receive, or otherwise acquire more than the
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HCS HB 1962 2
following amount: any number of packages of any drug product containing any detectable
amount of ephedrine, phenylpropanolamine, or pseudoephedrine, or any of their salts or
optical isomers, or salts of optical isomers, either as:
(1) The sole active ingredient; or
(2) One of the active ingredients of a combination drug; or
(3) A combination of any of the products specified in subdivisions (1) and (2) of this
subsection;

in any total amount greater than three and six-tenths grams without regard to the number of
transactions.
4. Within any twelve-month period, no person shall sell, dispense, or otherwise
provide to the same individual, and no person shall purchase, receive, or otherwise acquire
more than the following amount: any number of packages of any drug product containing any
detectable amount of ephedrine, phenylpropanolamine, or pseudoephedrine, or any of their
salts or optical isomers, or salts of optical isomers, either as:
(1) The sole active ingredient; or
(2) One of the active ingredients of a combination drug; or
(3) A combination of any of the products specified in subdivisions (1) and (2) of this
subsection;

in any total amount greater than [forty-three] sixty-one and two-tenths grams, without regard
to the number of transactions.
5. All packages of any compound, mixture, or preparation containing any detectable
quantity of ephedrine, phenylpropanolamine, or pseudoephedrine, or any of their salts or
optical isomers, or salts of optical isomers, except those that are excluded from Schedule V in
subsection 17 or 18 of section 195.017, shall be offered for sale only from behind a pharmacy
counter where the public is not permitted, and only by a registered pharmacist or registered
pharmacy technician under section 195.017.
6. Each pharmacy shall submit information regarding sales of any compound,
mixture, or preparation as specified in this section in accordance with transmission methods
and frequency established by the department by regulation.
7. (1) As used in this subsection, "administrator of the real-time electronic
pseudoephedrine tracking system" means the entity responsible for developing,
implementing, and maintaining the data collection system described in 19 CSR 30-
1.074 or any successor regulation.
(2) Beginning October 1, 2026, and continuing thereafter, any manufacturer of
any compound, mixture, or preparation specified in this section that is sold in or into the

HCS HB 1962 3
state shall, on a monthly basis, pay fees to the administrator of the real-time electronic
pseudoephedrine tracking system.
(3) The administrator of the real-time electronic pseudoephedrine tracking
system shall be responsible for setting the fee levels required under this subsection.
(4) Upon the request of the department of health and senior services, any
manufacturer required to pay fees under this subsection shall provide written
documentation demonstrating that the manufacturer has paid such fees.
(5) The fees required under this subsection shall be assessed against each
manufacturer solely on the basis of sales transactions involving that manufacturer's own
compounds, mixtures, or preparations sold in or into the state. No manufacturer shall
be assessed fees based upon transactions attributable to the compounds, mixtures, or
preparations of any other manufacturer.
8. No prescription shall be required for the dispensation, sale, or distribution of any
drug product containing any detectable amount of ephedrine, phenylpropanolamine, or
pseudoephedrine, or any of their salts or optical isomers, or salts of optical isomers, in an
amount within the limits described in subsections 2, 3, and 4 of this section. The
superintendent of the Missouri state highway patrol shall report to the revisor of statutes and
the general assembly by February first when the statewide number of methamphetamine
laboratory seizure incidents exceeds three hundred incidents in the previous calendar year.
The provisions of this subsection shall expire on April first of the calendar year in which the
revisor of statutes receives such notification.
[8.] 9. This section shall supersede and preempt any local ordinances or regulations,
including any ordinances or regulations enacted by any political subdivision of the state. This
section shall not apply to the sale of any animal feed products containing ephedrine or any
naturally occurring or herbal ephedra or extract of ephedra.
[9.] 10. Any local ordinances or regulations enacted by any political subdivision of
the state prior to August 28, 2020, requiring a prescription for the dispensation, sale, or
distribution of any drug product containing any detectable amount of ephedrine,
phenylpropanolamine, or pseudoephedrine, or any of their salts or optical isomers, or salts
of optical isomers, in an amount within the limits described in subsections 2, 3, and 4 of this
section shall be void and of no effect and no such political subdivision shall maintain or
enforce such ordinance or regulation.
[10.] 11. All logs, records, documents, and electronic information maintained for the
dispensing of these products shall be open for inspection and copying by municipal, county,
and state or federal law enforcement officers whose duty it is to enforce the controlled
substances laws of this state or the United States.

HCS HB 1962 4
[11.] 12. All persons who dispense or offer for sale pseudoephedrine and ephedrine
products, except those that are excluded from Schedule V in subsection 17 or 18 of section
195.017, shall ensure that all such products are located only behind a pharmacy counter where
the public is not permitted.
[12.] 13. The penalty for a knowing or reckless violation of this section is found in
section 579.060.
579.060. 1. A person commits the offense of unlawful sale, distribution, or purchase
of over-the-counter methamphetamine precursor drugs if he or she knowingly:
(1) Sells, distributes, dispenses, or otherwise provides any number of packages of any
drug product containing detectable amounts of ephedrine, phenylpropanolamine, or
pseudoephedrine, or any of their salts, optical isomers, or salts of optical isomers, in a
total amount greater than seven and two-tenths grams to the same individual within a thirty-
day period, unless the amount is dispensed, sold, or distributed pursuant to a valid
prescription; or
(2) Purchases, receives, or otherwise acquires within a thirty-day period any number
of packages of any drug product containing any detectable amount of ephedrine,
phenylpropanolamine, or pseudoephedrine, or any of their salts or optical isomers, or salts
of optical isomers in a total amount greater than seven and two-tenths grams, without regard
to the number of transactions, unless the amount is purchased, received, or acquired pursuant
to a valid prescription; or
(3) Purchases, receives, or otherwise acquires within a twenty-four-hour period any
number of packages of any drug product containing any detectable amount of ephedrine,
phenylpropanolamine, or pseudoephedrine, or any of their salts or optical isomers, or salts of
optical isomers in a total amount greater than three and six-tenths grams, without regard to the
number of transactions, unless the amount is purchased, received, or acquired pursuant to a
valid prescription; or
(4) Sells, distributes, dispenses, or otherwise provides any number of packages of any
drug product containing detectable amounts of ephedrine, phenylpropanolamine, or
pseudoephedrine, or any of their salts, optical isomers, or salts of optical isomers, in a
total amount greater than [forty-three] sixty-one and two-tenths grams to the same individual
within a twelve-month period, unless the amount is dispensed, sold, or distributed pursuant to
a valid prescription; or
(5) Purchases, receives, or otherwise acquires within a twelve-month period any
number of packages of any drug product containing any detectable amount of ephedrine,
phenylpropanolamine, or pseudoephedrine, or any of their salts or optical isomers, or salts of
optical isomers in a total amount greater than [forty-three] sixty-one and two-tenths grams,

HCS HB 1962 5
without regard to the number of transactions, unless the amount is purchased, received, or
acquired pursuant to a valid prescription; or
(6) Dispenses or offers drug products that are not excluded from Schedule V in
subsection 17 or 18 of section 195.017 and that contain detectable amounts of ephedrine,
phenylpropanolamine, or pseudoephedrine, or any of their salts, optical isomers, or salts of
optical isomers, without ensuring that such products are located behind a pharmacy counter
where the public is not permitted and that such products are dispensed by a registered
pharmacist or pharmacy technician under subsection 11 of section 195.017; or
(7) Holds a retail sales license issued under chapter 144 and knowingly sells or
dispenses packages that do not conform to the packaging requirements of section 195.418.
2. A pharmacist, intern pharmacist, or registered pharmacy technician commits the
offense of unlawful sale, distribution, or purchase of over-the-counter methamphetamine
precursor drugs if he or she knowingly:
(1) Sells, distributes, dispenses, or otherwise provides any number of packages of any
drug product containing detectable amounts of ephedrine, phenylpropanolamine, or
pseudoephedrine, or any of their salts or optical isomers, or salts of optical isomers, in a
total amount greater than three and six-tenth grams to the same individual within a twenty-
four hour period, unless the amount is dispensed, sold, or distributed pursuant to a valid
prescription; or
(2) Fails to submit information under subsection 13 of section 195.017 and subsection
6 of section 195.417 about the sales of any compound, mixture, or preparation of products
containing detectable amounts of ephedrine, phenylpropanolamine, or pseudoephedrine, or
any of their salts, optical isomers, or salts of optical isomers, in accordance with transmission
methods and frequency established by the department of health and senior services; or
(3) Fails to implement and maintain an electronic log, as required by subsection 12 of
section 195.017, of each transaction involving any detectable quantity of pseudoephedrine, its
salts, isomers, or salts of optical isomers or ephedrine, its salts, optical isomers, or salts of
optical isomers; or
(4) Sells, distributes, dispenses or otherwise provides to an individual under eighteen
years of age without a valid prescription any number of packages of any drug product
containing any detectable quantity of pseudoephedrine, its salts, isomers, or salts of optical
isomers, or ephedrine, its salts or optical isomers, or salts of optical isomers.
3. Any person who violates the packaging requirements of section 195.418 and is
considered the general owner or operator of the outlet where ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, or
phenylpropanolamine products are available for sale shall not be penalized if he or she
documents that an employee training program was in place to provide the employee who

HCS HB 1962 6
made the unlawful retail sale with information on the state and federal regulations regarding
ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, or phenylpropanolamine.
4. A manufacturer commits the offense of unlawful sale, distribution, or
purchase of over-the-counter methamphetamine precursor drugs if he or she knowingly
fails to pay the fees required under subsection 7 of section 195.417.
5. The offense of unlawful sale, distribution, or purchase of over-the-counter
methamphetamine precursor drugs is a class A misdemeanor.
✔